apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="کردن__vblex_lvc">
    <e><p><l>نەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="نەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>نەدەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="نەدەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="نەدەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>دەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="دەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ئەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="دەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>مەک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="مەک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>بک</l><r>کردن</r></p><par n="بک__vblex_tv"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کردنەوە__vblex_lvc">
    <e><p><l>نەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>نەدەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ئەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="دەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>دەک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="دەک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e><p><l>بک</l><r>کردنەوە</r></p><par n="بک_ەوە__vblex_tv"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەچ__lvc_iv">
      <e><p><l>دەچ</l><r>چوون<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>نەدەچ</l><r>چوون<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناچ</l><r>چوون<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
      <e><p><l>نەچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="نەچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
      <e><p><l>مەچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="مەچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
      <e><p><l>بچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="بچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    </pardef>


   <pardef n="بانگ_کردن__vblex">
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>م</l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>م</l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>ت</l><r>تۆ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>ی</l><r>ئەو<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>ین</l><r>ئێمە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>ن</l><r>ئێوە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e r="LR"><p><l>ن</l><r>ئەوان<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
 <!--       <e><p><l>م<b/></l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
        <e r="LR"><p><l></l><r><b/></r></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>
        <e><p><l><b/></l><r><b/></r></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>
 <!--       <e><p><l>م<b/></l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
<!--        <e><p><l>ت<b/></l><r>تۆ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
<!--        <e><p><l>ی<b/></l><r>ئەو<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
<!--        <e><p><l>ین<b/></l><r>ئێمە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
<!--        <e><p><l>ن<b/></l><r>ئێوە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
  <!--      <e><p><l>ن<b/></l><r>ئەوان<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r><j/></p><par n="کردن__vblex_lvc"/></e>-->
   </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="ئایا__qst">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="qst"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->
    <pardef n="من__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="تۆ__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ئەو__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ئێمە__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ئێوە__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ئەوان__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Clitics -->
    <pardef n="pers__prn_clt">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r></r></p><par n="من__prn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r></r></p><par n="تۆ__prn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r></r></p><par n="ئەو__prn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r></r></p><par n="ئێمە__prn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r></r></p><par n="ئێوە__prn"/></e>
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r></r></p><par n="ئەوان__prn"/></e>	
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="poss__clt">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>م</l><r>من<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r>تۆ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r>تۆ<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئەو<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r>ئەو<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r>ئێمە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r>ئێمە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r>ئێوە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r>ئێوە<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r>ئەوان<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r>ئەوان<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="clt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="poss__agr">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="px1sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="px2sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="px2sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="px3sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="px3sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="px1pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="px2pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="px2pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="px3pl"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="px3pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="px1sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="px2sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="px3sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
      <e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="px1pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
      <e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="px2pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
      <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="px3pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>	
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ئایا"><i>ئایا</i><par n="ئایا__qst"/></e>
    <e lm="ئاخۆ"><i>ئاخۆ</i><par n="ئایا__qst"/></e>
    <e lm="من"><i>من</i><par n="من__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="تۆ"><i>تۆ</i><par n="تۆ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەو"><i>ئەو</i><par n="ئەو__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ئێمە"><i>ئێمە</i><par n="ئێمە__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەمئێوە"><i>ئێوە</i><par n="ئێوە__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەوان"><i>ئەوان</i><par n="ئەوان__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="بەرەوپێشچوون"><p><l>بەرەوپێش</l><r>بەرەوپێش</r></p><par n="دەچ__lvc_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="بانگ کردن"><p><l>بانگ</l><r>بانگ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="هەست کردن"><p><l>هەست</l><r>هەست</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="هەست پێ کردن"><p><l>هەست<b/>داگیرپێ</l><r>هەست<b/>داگیرپێ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نوێژ کردن"><p><l>نوێژ</l><r>نوێژ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="میز کردن"><p><l>میز</l><r>میز</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="کۆمەڵ کردن"><p><l>کۆمەڵ</l><r>کۆمەڵ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="قسە کردن"><p><l>قسە</l><r>قسە</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="سێکس کردن"><p><l>سێکس</l><r>سێکس</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="درۆ کردن"><p><l>درۆ</l><r>درۆ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="داوا کردن"><p><l>داوا</l><r>داوا</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="خیزە کردن"><p><l>خیزە</l><r>خیزە</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تەواو کردن"><p><l>تەواو</l><r>تەواو</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تەماشا کردن"><p><l>تەماشا</l><r>تەماشا</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="تاووتوێ کردن"><p><l>تاووتوێ</l><r>تاووتوێ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پەسەند کردن"><p><l>پەسەند</l><r>پەسەند</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پارێزگاری کردن"><p><l>پارێزگاری</l><r>پارێزگاری</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بۆن کردن"><p><l>بۆن</l><r>بۆن</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="بەزۆر داگیر کردن"><p><l>بەزۆر<b/>داگیر</l><r>بەزۆر<b/>داگیر</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ڕاوێژ کردن"><p><l>ڕاوێژ</l><r>ڕاوێژ</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="پارێزگاری کردن"><p><l>پارێزگاری</l><r>پارێزگاری</r></p><par n="بانگ_کردن__vblex"/></e>
